apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="/jeg__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>jeg</l>       <r>jeg<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mig</l>       <r>jeg<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/u__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ha/n__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>m</l>         <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="h/un__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>un<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endes</l>     <r>un<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="den__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="det__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/vi__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>vi</l>        <r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/I__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>I</l>         <r>I<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jer</l>       <r>I<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="de__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>m</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>       <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/an__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sig__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="selv__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="eg/en__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hvilke/n__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="alting/__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="al/__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="nog/en__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="and/en__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/enne__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>enne</l>      <r>enne<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>      <r>enne<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isse</l>      <r>enne<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mang/e__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="samme__prn"> <!-- TODO: CHECK THIS -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ingenting__prn"> <!-- TODO: CHECK THIS -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="begge__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="in/gen__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tet</l>       <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="der__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/som__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>som</l>       <r>som<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hvis</l>      <r>som<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="jeg">             <i></i><par n="/jeg__prn"/></e>
<e lm="vi">              <i></i><par n="/vi__prn"/></e>
<e lm="I">               <i></i><par n="/I__prn"/></e>
<e lm="al">              <i>al</i><par n="al/__prn"/></e>
<e lm="allesammen">      <i>allesammen</i><par n="alting/__prn"/></e>
<e lm="alting">          <i>alting</i><par n="alting/__prn"/></e>
<e lm="altsammen">       <i>altsammen</i><par n="alting/__prn"/></e>
<e lm="anden">           <i>and</i><par n="and/en__prn"/></e>
<e lm="begge">           <i>begge</i><par n="begge__prn"/></e>
<e lm="du">              <i>d</i><par n="d/u__prn"/></e>
<e lm="denne">           <i>d</i><par n="d/enne__prn"/></e>
<e lm="de">              <i>de</i><par n="de__prn"/></e>
<e lm="den">             <i>den</i><par n="den__prn"/></e>
<e lm="der">             <i>der</i><par n="der__prn"/></e>
<e lm="det">             <i>det</i><par n="det__prn"/></e>
<e lm="hun">             <i>h</i><par n="h/un__prn"/></e>
<e lm="han">             <i>ha</i><par n="ha/n__prn"/></e>
<e lm="hinanden">        <i>hinanden</i><par n="samme__prn"/></e>
<e lm="hvilken">         <i>hvilke</i><par n="hvilke/n__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ingen">           <i>in</i><par n="in/gen__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ingenting">       <i>ingenting</i><par n="ingenting__prn"/></e>
<e lm="man">             <i>m</i><par n="m/an__prn"/></e>
<e lm="mange">           <i>mang</i><par n="mang/e__prn"/></e>
<e lm="nogen">           <i>nog</i><par n="nog/en__prn"/></e>
<e lm="samme">           <i>samme</i><par n="samme__prn"/></e>
<e lm="selv">            <i>selv</i><par n="selv__prn"/></e>
<e lm="sig">             <i>sig</i><par n="sig__prn"/></e>
<e lm="som">             <i></i><par n="/som__prn"/></e>
<e lm="sådan">           <i>sådan</i><par n="ingenting__prn"/></e>
<e lm="egen">            <i>eg</i><par n="eg/en__prn"/></e>
